en: strip, band, tab
fr: Bandelette, bandelettes, bandes, bande, languette, languettes

en: Ampoule, ampul, ampule
bg: Крушка
de: Ampulle
fr: Ampoule
hr: ampula
nl: Ampulle

en: Blister, Blister pack
bg: Блистер
de: Blister, Blisterverpackung
es: Blíster
fr: Blister
hu: Bliszter
nl: Blister
pt: Blister

en: Roll, mandrel
de: Rolle
fr: Rouleau, Bobine, Mandrin, Mandrin / Rouleau

en: Canister
de: Kanister, Wasserkanister
fr: Bombonne, bombonnes, bonbonne, bonbonnes
nl: Spuitbus, spuitbussen

en: neck seal
fr: Collerette

en: Wire cage
de: Drahtkorb, Agraffe
fr: Muselet, Fermeture rigide / Fermoir / Muselet

en: hanger
bg: закачалка
de: Kleiderbügel
fr: Cintre
nl: Kleerhanger
pt: Cabide

en: Wedge, wedges, wedging, corner piece
fr: Cale, Coin, Cornière, calage, cales, chips, croisillons, flocons, frites, copeaux, copeaux de bois, bourre, coussin, buvard, Calage (chips - croisillons - flocons - frites - copeaux de bois - bourre…) / Cale / Coussin / Buvard

en: Vial, flask
de: Flakon
fr: Flacon
nl: Flacon, Flacons

en: Clamping ring
de: Klemmring, Spannring
fr: Collier

en: wrapper, wrapping
de: Hülle, Umhüllung
es: envoltorio
fr: enveloppage
pt: invólucro

en: Sleeve, sleeves
de: Schrumpfhülle
fr: Gaine, gaines, manchon, manchons, sleever, sleevers

en: envelope
bg: плик
da: konvolut
de: Umschlag, Kuvert, Briefumschlag
es: sobre
fr: enveloppe
it: busta
nl: wikkel, vensterenvelop, sleeve
sv: kuvert

en: String, strings, ribbon, ribbons, adhesive tapes, gift ribbon, gift ribbons
de: Schnur, Geschenkband
fr: ficelle, ficelles, ruban, rubans

en: individual dose, Individual capsule
ar: جرعة فردية، كبسولة فردية
az: fərdi doza, fərdi kapsul
bg: индивидуална доза, индивидуална капсула
bn: পৃথক ডোজ, পৃথক ক্যাপসুল
ca: dosi individual, càpsula individual
cs: jednotlivá dávka, jednotlivá kapsle
de: Einzeldosis, Einzelkapsel, Portionspackung
el: μεμονωμένη δόση, μεμονωμένη κάψουλα
es: dosis individual, cápsula individual
et: individuaalne annus, individuaalne kapsel
fa: دوز فردی، کپسول فردی
fi: yksittäinen annos, yksittäinen kapseli
fr: dose invididuelle, doses individuelles, dosette, dosettes
he: מנה אישית, קפסולה אישית
hi: व्यक्तिगत खुराक, व्यक्तिगत कैप्सूल
hu: egyedi adag, egyedi kapszula
id: dosis individual, kapsul individual
it: dose individuale, capsula individuale
ja: 個別用量、個別カプセル
ko: 개별 용량, 개별 캡슐
lt: individuali dozė, individuali kapsulė
nl: individuele dosis, individuele capsule
pl: dawka indywidualna, kapsułka indywidualna
pt: dose individual, cápsula individual
ro: doza individuală, capsulă individuală
ru: индивидуальная доза, индивидуальная капсула
sk: individuálna dávka, individuálna kapsula
sq: dozë individuale, kapsulë individuale
sv: individuell dos, individuell kapsel
th: ปริมาณต่อหน่วย, แคปซูลเดี่ยว
tr: bireysel doz, bireysel kapsül
uk: індивідуальна доза, індивідуальна капсула
zh: 独立剂量，独立胶囊

en: Protection cover
de: Schutzhülle, Schutzhaube
fr: Housse, housses, housse de protection, housses de protection
nl: Beschermingshoes, beschermingshoezen

en: pump bottle, spray, spray bottle, applicator bottle
de: Sprühflasche
es: espray
fr: Flacon à pompe, flacons à pompe, flacon à pistolet, flacons à pistolet, Spray, sprays
it: flacone con pompa, flaconi con pompa, flacone spray, flaconi spray
nl: Spuitfles, spuitflessen
pt: Frasco com bomba, frascos com bomba, frasco spray, frascos spray

en: squeeze bottle
de: Quetschflasche, Dosierflasche, Spritzflasche, Drückflasche
es: botella exprimible, botella de apretar
fr: flacon souple, flacon pressable, flacon à presser, squeezer
it: flacone a pressione, flacone spremibile
nl: Knijpfles, knijpflessen
pt: frasco de apertar, frasco de espremer

en: Aerosol can, aerosol cans, aerosol spray
ar: علبة رذاذ, علب رذاذ, رذاذ الهباء الجوي
az: Aerozol qutusu, aerozol qutuları, aerozol spreyi
bg: Аерозолен спрей, аерозолни спрейове, аерозолен флакон
bn: অ্যারোসল ক্যান, অ্যারোসল ক্যান, অ্যারোসল স্প্রে
ca: Aerosol, aerosols
cs: Aerosolová dóza, aerosolové dózy, aerosolový sprej
da: Aerosoldåse, aerosoldåser, aerosolspray
de: Sprühdose, Spraydose, Aerosoldose
el: Αεροζόλ, δοχεία αεροζόλ, σπρέι αεροζόλ
es: Aerosol, aerosoles
et: Aerosoolpurk, aerosoolpurgid, aerosoolpihusti
fa: قوطی آئروسل، قوطی های آئروسل، اسپری آئروسل
fi: Aerosolitölkki, aerosolitölkit, aerosolisuihke
fr: Aérosol, aérosols
he: מיכל אירוסול, מכלי אירוסול, תרסיס אירוסול
hi: एरोसोल कैन, एरोसोल कैन, एरोसोल स्प्रे
hr: Aerosolna limenka, aerosolne limenke, aerosolni sprej
hu: Aeroszolos doboz, aeroszolos dobozok, aeroszolos spray
id: Kaleng aerosol, kaleng aerosol, semprotan aerosol
it: Bomboletta spray, bombolette spray
ja: エアゾール缶、エアゾール缶、エアゾールスプレー
ko: 에어로졸 캔, 에어로졸 캔, 에어로졸 스프레이
lt: Aerozolinis flakonas, aerozoliniai flakonai, aerozolinis purškalas
pl: Aerozol, aerozole
pt: Aerossol, aerossóis
ro: Aerosol, aerosoli
ru: Аэрозольный баллон, аэрозольные баллоны, аэрозольный спрей
sk: Aerosólová nádoba, aerosólové nádoby, aerosólový sprej
sq: Sprej aerosol, kanaçe aerosol, aerosole
sv: Aerosolburk, aerosolburkar, aerosolspray
th: กระป๋องสเปรย์, สเปรย์
tr: Aerosol kutusu, aerosol kutuları, aerosol spreyi
uk: Аерозольний балон, аерозольні балони, аерозольний спрей
zh: 气雾罐，气雾罐，气雾喷雾